District of Columbia statutes.
42-3226

Lease held by an infant or person with a mental disability — Costs of renewal chargeable to estate of infant or person with a disability or deemed charge upon leasehold.

All and every sum and sums of money and other consideration, paid or advanced by any such guardian, trustee, committee or other person, for or on account of the renewal of any such lease or leases, and all reasonable charges incident thereto, shall be paid out of the estate or effects of the infant or person with a mental illness for whose benefit the said lease or leases shall be renewed, or shall be a charge and incumbrance upon the leasehold premises, together with interest for the same, as the said court shall direct and determine.

29 Geo. 2, ch. 31, § 2, 1756
Kilty’s Rep. 253
Alex. Br. Stat. 789
Comp. Stat. D.C., 335, § 71
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 64(e), 53 DCR 6198
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 26(b), 59 DCR 5567
1981 Ed., § 45-1426.
1973 Ed., § 45-928.
D.C. Law 16-305 rewrote the section heading, which formerly read: “Lease held by infant or mentally handicapped—Costs of renewal chargeable to estate of infant or handicapped or deemed charge upon leasehold.”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “person with a mental illness” for “lunatic.”
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.